Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.483

Annual increase amount—Legislature's rights reserved—No additional increases after June 30, 2011.

(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, the annual increase amount as defined in RCW 41.32.010(4) shall be increased by an amount equal to $0.40 per month per year of service minus the 2008 gain-sharing increase amount under *RCW 41.31.010 as it exists on July 22, 2007. This adjustment shall not decrease the annual increase amount, and is not to exceed $0.20 per month per year of service. The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member or beneficiary has the contractual right to receive this adjustment to the annual increase amount not granted prior to that time.

(2) The adjustment to the annual increase amount as set forth in section 5, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 was intended by the legislature as a replacement benefit for gain-sharing. If the repeal of **chapter 41.31 RCW is held to be invalid in a final determination of a court of law, and the court orders reinstatement of gain-sharing or other alternate benefits as a remedy, then this adjustment to the annual increase amount shall not be included in future annual increase amounts paid on or after the date of such reinstatement.

(3) No additional annual increase under this section shall be provided after June 30, 2011.

[ 2011 c 362 s 2; 2007 c 491 s 5.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 41.31.010 was repealed by 2007 c 491 s 13, effective January 2, 2008.

**(2) Chapter 41.31 RCW was repealed by 2007 c 491 s 13, effective January 2, 2008.

Finding—Intent—2011 c 362: "Chapter 561, Laws of 2009 made necessary changes to the funding plan for the fiscal integrity of the teachers' retirement system, plan 1 and the public employees' retirement system, plan 1, and provides a basis for improvements in the financial soundness of the pension plans. The legislature now finds that changing economic conditions have also made necessary the amendatory provisions contained in this act. Due to the current extraordinary economic recession and due to the financial demands of other core responsibilities of government, it is not feasible for public employers of this state to fund the annual increase amount and continue to ensure the fiscal integrity of these pension funds. The legislature further clarifies and affirms that the intent of the legislature in section 5, chapter 345, Laws of 1995 and this act is to not create any contractual rights to the annual increase amount on the part of the public employees' retirement system, plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system, plan 1 members or retirees. Having reserved the right to amend or repeal these provisions in RCW 41.32.489(6) and 41.40.197(5), the legislature is now exercising that right through this act." [ 2011 c 362 s 1.]

Effective date—2011 c 362: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 2011." [ 2011 c 362 s 10.]

Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—2007 c 491: See notes following RCW 41.32.765.